Hawaii statutes.
§607-3.5 Security for costs. The
several courts shall have power to require either the plaintiff or defendant,
upon the application of the opposite party, to give security for costs in any
civil cause, upon such terms and conditions as the court deems just. [L 1972, c
88, §5(c)]

Cross References

Vexatious litigants; security, see chapter 634J.

Case Notes

There is a wide discretion in the matter of requiring
security for costs. 26 H. 112, 116; 34 H. 308; 35 H. 907. Security for costs
may be required after answer has been filed. Id. A circuit judge at chambers
in proceedings for probate of a will may require of contestant security for
costs. 29 H. 455. See 22 H. 303, cited 29 H. 242, 243, as to necessity for
finality of judgment in order to appeal. As to "final judgment" see
pt. I A2 of note appended to chapter 641.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next